Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF73.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1416XS (4) 91 th/ns S.F. 73 Section 1. Section 321.285, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. Unless otherwise provided in this section or by other 3 speed restrictions, the speed limit for all vehicular traffic 4 shall be fifty-five sixty miles per hour. 5 Sec. 2. IMPLEMENTATION. Notwithstanding section 321.252, 6 321.255, 321.285, or any other provision of law to the 7 contrary, when updating speed limit signs as a result of the 8 enactment of this Act, the agency that exercises jurisdiction 9 over a highway for which the speed limit increased may attach 10 nonpermanent overlays or stickers approved by the department 11 of transportation to existing speed limit signs in order 12 to display the new speed limit. The nonpermanent overlays 13 or stickers may be used by the applicable agency until the 14 applicable speed limit sign is replaced based on the agencyâs 15 replacement schedule and any applicable specifications or 16 requirements. 17